Connecticut, session 2026, SB00317.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (Effective from passage) The Commissioner of Energy and
Environmental Protection shall convene a working group within the
Department of Energy and Environmental Protection to examine the
need for and viability and impact of suspending, for a period not to
exceed five consecutive fiscal years, the fee described in section 22a-232
of the general statutes for one or more resource recovery facilities in the
state. Such examination may consider other means to meet any such
identified need, including, but not limited to, the availability of state
grant, tax abatement or financing programs. Such working group shall,
at a minimum, consist of one member from each of the member towns
of the Bristol Resource Recovery Facility Operating Committee, the
Commissioner of Energy and Environmental Protection, or the
commissioner's designee, the Secretary of the Office of Policy and
Management, or the secretary's designee, the Commissioner of
Economic and Community Development, or the commissioner's
designee, and any other member deemed necessary by the
Commissioner of Energy and Environmental Protection. Not later than
January 1, 2027, the Commissioner of Energy and Environmental
Protection shall submit a report, in accordance with the provisions of

Substitute Senate Bill No. 317
section 11-4a of the general statutes, to the joint standing committee of
the General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to the
environment on the nature and result of such examination, the
identified need for such a suspension for any such resource recovery
facility in the state, the availability of other state resources or programs
to meet any such identified need and any legislative recommendations
directly related to such examination.
Governor's Action:
Approved June 4, 2026
Special Act No. 26-25 2 of 2